test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONGVW_NoExtra_bingode_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obingodeishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obingodeishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obingodeishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeensimishinaaniban
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bingodeensimishiwaaiban
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bingodeensimishiniiban
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeensimishini***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeenhimishinaaniban
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bingodeenhimishiwaaiban
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bingodeenhimishiniiban
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeensimishinaanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeensimishinaanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeensimishinaaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bingodeensimishiwaaan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bingodeensimishiwaaag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bingodeensimishiwaaing
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bingodeensimishinian
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bingodeensimishiniag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bingodeensimishiniing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeenhimishinaanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeenhimishinaanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeenhimishinaaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bingodeenhimishiwaaan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bingodeenhimishiwaaag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bingodeenhimishiwaaing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bingodeenhimishinian
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bingodeenhimishiniag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bingodeenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bingodeensimishibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bingodeensimishibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bingodeensimishibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensimish***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensimish***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensimish***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhimishibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhimishibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhimishibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhimish***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensiminaanibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensiminaanibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensiminaanibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensimiwaaibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensimiwaaibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensimiwaaibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeensiminiibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeensiminiibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeensiminiibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensimini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensimini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensimini***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhiminaanibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhiminaanibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhiminaanibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhimiwaaibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhimiwaaibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhimiwaaibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhiminiibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhiminiibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhiminiibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhimini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensishinaanibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensishinaanibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensishinaanibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensishiwaaibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensishiwaaibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensishiwaaibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeensishiniibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeensishiniibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeensishiniibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensishini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensishini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensishini***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhishinaanibanan
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhishinaanibanag
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhishinaanibaning
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhishiwaaibanan
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhishiwaaibanag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhishiwaaibaning
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhishiniibanan
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhishiniibanag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhishiniibaning
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhishini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeimishinaanibanan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeimishinaanibanag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeimishinaanibaning
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeimishiwaaibanan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeimishiwaaibanag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeimishiwaaibaning
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeimishiniibanan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeimishiniibanag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeimishiniibaning
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimishini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimishini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nibingodeensimishinaaniban
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nibingodeensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nibingodeensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nibingodeensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nibingodeensimishiniiban
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nibingodeensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nibingodeenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nibingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nibingodeenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nibingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nibingodeenhimishiniiban
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nibingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gibingodeensimishinaaniban
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gibingodeensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gibingodeensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gibingodeensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gibingodeensimishiniiban
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gibingodeensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gibingodeenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gibingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gibingodeenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gibingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gibingodeenhimishiniiban
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gibingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: obingodeensimishinaaniban
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: obingodeensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: obingodeensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: obingodeensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: obingodeensimishiniiban
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: obingodeensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: obingodeenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: obingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: obingodeenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: obingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: obingodeenhimishiniiban
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: obingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
